Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Board of Claims

44.070.
Board of Claims — Limitation on damage awards — Hearing officers — Asbestos related claims. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, §§ 1, 3, par. 1; 1950, ch. 50, § 1; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XIII, § 1; 1958, ch. 52, § 1; 1960, ch. 25, § 1; 1972, ch. 234, § 1; 1976, ch. 326, § 2; 1978, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 499, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 304, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.040

effective June 29, 2017.

44.071.
Jurisdiction of Board of Claims as to municipal maintenance of state-owned traffic control devices.

The Board of Claims, created by KRS

44.070

, is hereby vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction to investigate, hear proof, and compensate persons for damages sustained to either person or property as approximate result of negligence on the part of any municipality, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment by the municipality, or any agency thereof, relating to the maintenance by the municipality of state-owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth.

Claims for personal injury or property damage against any municipality, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment of the municipality, arising out of negligence in the maintenance of state-owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth, shall be limited and reduced in the same manner as described in KRS

44.070

with respect to claims against the Commonwealth.

It is the intention of subsections (1) and (2) of this section to provide every municipality and agency thereof, and their respective officers, agents, or employees with the same liability protection, restrictions, and reductions when such municipalities and agencies are performing maintenance on state-owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth as the Commonwealth and its agencies, officers, and employees would enjoy if performing the work itself.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

44.071.
Jurisdiction of Board of Claims as to municipal maintenance of state-owned traffic control devices. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

44.072.
Legislative intent as to sovereign immunity in negligence claims. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 499, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

44.073.
State institutions of higher education declared agencies of state government — Jurisdiction of Board of Claims — Sovereign immunity. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 499, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

44.075.
Source of payment of expenses of Workers’ Compensation Board. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 25, § 4; repealed by 2017 ch. 74, § 106, effective June 29, 2017.

44.080.
Sessions of board — Rules — Subpoenas — Oaths. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 5; 1948, ch. 193; repealed by 2017 ch. 74, § 106, effective June 29, 2017.

44.084.
Venue of hearings. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 25, § 2; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

44.086.
Investigation of claims — Additional information on claims under $1,000 — Hearings — Order — Review. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 25, § 3; 1978, ch. 299, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 355, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 304, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 9, effective June 29, 2017.

44.090.
Defense to claims. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 6; 1950, ch. 50, § 2; 1986, ch. 499, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 10, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.100

effective June 29, 2017.

44.100.
Compensation of board, assistant attorneys general or attorneys appointed by Governor — Payment of awards — Cost of operation. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, §§ 7, 8; 1950, ch. 50, § 3; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XIII, § 2; 1958, ch. 52, § 2; 1960, ch. 25, § 5; 1986, ch. 499, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 11, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.110

effective June 29, 2017.

44.110.
When claims must be presented. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 3(a); 1950, ch. 50, § 4; 1958, ch. 52, § 5; 1962, ch. 304, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 53; 1986, ch. 499, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 12, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.120

effective June 29, 2017.

44.115.
Purpose of exception to limitation of KRS 44.110. [Repealed.]

44.120.
Conditions of awards. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 2; 1950, ch. 50, § 5; 1960, ch. 25, § 6; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 13, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.130

effective June 29, 2017.

44.130.
Enforcement and entry of awards. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 4; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 14, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.140

effective June 29, 2017.

44.140.
Appeal from award or judgment of board. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 9; 1958, ch. 52, § 3; 1960, ch. 25, § 7; 1980, ch. 291, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 355, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 304, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 15, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.150

effective June 29, 2017.

44.150.
Appeal to Court of Appeals. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 189, § 10; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.160

effective June 29, 2017.

44.160.
Exclusiveness of board’s award or judgment. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 3(b); 1950, ch. 50, § 6; 1958, ch. 52, § 4; 1986, ch. 499, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 17, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section was renumbered as
KRS §

49.170

effective June 29, 2017.

44.165.
Monetary threshold for claims brought before board. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 304, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered 2017, ch. 74, § 18, effective June 29, 2017.

44.170.
Transfer of pending cases. [Repealed.]